District of Columbia statutes.
11-1505

Vacations.

(a)

Each judge of the District of Columbia courts shall be entitled to an annual vacation of not more than 30 calendar days. Such vacation shall be taken at such time or times as prescribed by the chief judge of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals for judges of that court and by the chief judge of the Superior Court for judges of that court. Time spent by a judge as a member of any conference, committee, or commission established by law shall not be deducted from the judge’s vacation period.

(b)

In determining when a judge shall take a vacation, and the length thereof, the chief judge exercising authority under this section shall be mindful of the necessity of retaining sufficient judicial personnel in the court under the chief judge’s supervision to permit at all times the prompt and effective disposition of the business of such court.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 492, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(23), (24), 108 Stat. 713

Cross References

D.C. retirement funds, transition from District of Columbia Administration, see § 1-819.01.
Judges, tenure, see § 11-1502.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1505.
1973 Ed., § 11-1505.